Florida, session 2026, SB492.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 12 489.127, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (1) of 13 that section is republished, to read: 14 489.127âProhibitions; penalties.â 15 (1)âNo person shall: 16 (a)âFalsely hold himself or herself or a business 17 organization out as a licensee, certificateholder, or 18 registrant; 19 (b)âFalsely impersonate a certificateholder or registrant; 20 (c)âPresent as his or her own the certificate or 21 registration of another; 22 (d)âKnowingly give false or forged evidence to the board or 23 a member thereof; 24 (e)âUse or attempt to use a certificate or registration 25 that has been suspended or revoked; 26 (f)âEngage in the business or act in the capacity of a 27 contractor or advertise himself or herself or a business 28 organization as available to engage in the business or act in 29 the capacity of a contractor without being duly registered or 30 certified; 31 (g)âOperate a business organization engaged in contracting 32 after 60 days following the termination of its only qualifying 33 agent without designating another primary qualifying agent, 34 except as provided in ss. 489.119 and 489.1195; 35 (h)âCommence or perform work for which a building permit is 36 required pursuant to part IV of chapter 553 without such 37 building permit being in effect; or 38 (i)âWillfully or deliberately disregard or violate any 39 municipal or county ordinance relating to uncertified or 40 unregistered contractors. 41 42 For purposes of this subsection, a person or business 43 organization operating on an inactive or suspended certificate 44 or registration is not duly certified or registered and is 45 considered unlicensed. A business tax receipt issued under the 46 authority of chapter 205 is not a license for purposes of this 47 part. 48 (2)(a)âAn Any unlicensed person who violates any of the 49 provisions of subsection (1) commits a misdemeanor of the first 50 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. A 51 person convicted under this paragraph must be sentenced to a 52 minimum of either: 53 1.âFifteen days in jail; or 54 2.âTwelve months of probation. 55 56 The remedies set forth in this subsection are not exclusive and 57 may be imposed in addition to the remedies set forth in s. 58 489.129(2). 59 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 60 made by this act to section 489.127, Florida Statutes, in a 61 reference thereto, subsection (7) of section 489.13, Florida 62 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 63 489.13âUnlicensed contracting; notice of noncompliance; 64 fine; authority to issue or receive a building permit; web 65 page.â 66 (7)âThe remedies set forth in this section are not 67 exclusive and may be imposed in addition to the remedies set 68 forth in s. 489.127(2). In addition, nothing in this section is 69 intended to prohibit the department or any local governing body 70 from filing a civil action or seeking criminal penalties against 71 an unlicensed contractor. 72 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.